Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8395. TRAVIS COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 3

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8395.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(3) "Director" means a member of the board.

(4) "District" means the Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 3.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8395.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Travis County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8395.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8395.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1.03, Chapter 791, Acts of the 74th Legislature, Regular Session, 1995, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(3) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8395.005. PROHIBITION AGAINST IMPAIRMENT OF DISTRICT. A municipality in whose extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located may not take any action, including passing an ordinance or resolution, that:

(1) impairs the district's ability to exercise the district's powers under this chapter; or

(2) limits the district's ability to finance, construct, or operate the district's water, wastewater, or drainage systems.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8395.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8395.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by general law applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49, 50, and 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. MUNICIPAL ANNEXATION

Sec. 8395.151. ANNEXATION BY MUNICIPALITY. (a) The governing body of a municipality that plans to annex all or part of the district first must adopt a resolution of intention to annex all or part of the district and transmit that resolution to the district and the following districts:

(1) Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 4;

(2) Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 5;

(3) Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 6;

(4) Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 7;

(5) Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 8;

(6) Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 9; and

(7) Travis County Water Control and Improvement District No. 19.

(b) On receipt of a resolution described by Subsection (a), the district and each of the districts listed in Subsection (a) shall call an election to be held on the next uniform election date on the question of whether the annexation should be authorized.

(c) The municipality may annex the territory described by the resolution only if a majority of the total number of voters voting in all of the districts' elections vote in favor of authorizing the annexation.

(d) The municipality seeking annexation shall pay the costs of the elections held under this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 44, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 8395.152. DUTIES OF MUNICIPALITY AFTER ANNEXATION. If a municipality in whose extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located annexes the district for full or limited purposes and the annexation precludes or impairs the ability of the district to issue bonds, the municipality shall:

(1) simultaneously with the annexation, pay in cash to the landowner or developer of the district a sum equal to all actual costs and expenses incurred by the landowner or developer in connection with the district that:

(A) the district has agreed in writing to pay; and

(B) would otherwise have been eligible for reimbursement from bond proceeds under the rules and requirements of the commission as those rules and requirements exist on the date of annexation; and

(2) after the annexation, install all necessary water, wastewater, and drainage facilities to serve full buildout of development within the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2015.